Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5379.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 13 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINALS — CORRECTIONAL
INSTITUTIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 10.1
COMMISSION ON PARDONS
13-10.1-1. Commission on pardons established – Duties.
(a) There is hereby established a commission on pardons to administer the application
process, consider applicants, and ultimately make recommendations to the governor regarding
applicants seeking an executive pardon pursuant to Article IX, Section 13 of the Constitution of
Rhode Island.
(b) A person shall only be considered for a pardon if:
(1) A person has completed their sentence and is ineligible for an expungement pursuant
to §§ 12-1.3-1 through 12-1.3-5;
(2) A person is eligible for expungement, has applied for expungement, and has been
denied; or
(3) A person is on probation and is eligible for early termination of probation pursuant to
Rule 35(c) of the Rhode Island superior court rules of criminal procedure.
(c) The commission shall be responsible for promulgating rules and regulations necessary
for developing an application process for applicants seeking to request a pardon including, but not

limited to:
(1) Establishing what documents and forms need to be submitted with an application in
order to be considered for a pardon;
(2) Establishing a timeline for an applicant to receive a response; and
(3) Establishing criteria for determining a person’s eligibility for recommendation of a
pardon by the commission.
(d) The commission shall submit to the governor the names of those individuals whom they
determine should be considered for a pardon, and the governor shall have the authority to submit
any of those recommended names, or any others, to the state senate for advice and consent.
13-10.1-2. Composition of commission.
(a) The commission on pardons shall consist of nine (9) members that would be appointed
for a two (2) year term. Members of the commission shall be as follows:
(1) An appointee from the judicial branch who shall be appointed the by chief justice of
the Rhode Island supreme court;
(2) An appointee from the department of the attorney general who shall be appointed by
the attorney general;
(3) An appointee from the office of the public defender who shall be appointed by the chief
public defender;
(4) An appointee from the Rhode Island office of parole/probation who shall be appointed
by the governor;
(5) An appointee from the nonviolence institute who shall be appointed by the director of
the institute. The appointee must be an active member of the institute;
(6) An appointee from the Economic Progress Insitute who shall be appointed by the
director of the institute. The appointee must be an active member of the institute;
(7) An appointee from the reentry campus program who shall be appointed by the director
of the program. The appointee must be an active member of the program;
(8) An appointee from OpenDoors who shall be appointed by the director of the program.
The appointee must be an active member of the program;
(9) An appointee from the center for indigenous people’s rights who shall be appointed by
the director of the center. The appointee must be an active member of the center.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001116
========
LC001116 - Page 2 of 3